Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-206
Change in service; confirmation.

Within thirty days after a subscriber changes his or her authorized provider of basic local exchange service, intra-LATA interexchange service, or inter-LATA interexchange service, the new authorized service provider shall provide to such subscriber written confirmation of such change of service. The written confirmation shall (1) describe clearly and simply the nature of the change of service, (2) not be a part of, or attached to, any other document, (3) not contain any promotion, offer, or inducement, and (4) be mailed to the subscriber's billing address.

Laws 1999, LB 150, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1906;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 68.